Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS
32-1-109. Early hearings.

All cases in which there arises a question of the validity of the organization of a special district or a question of the validity of any proceeding under this article shall be advanced as a matter of immediate public interest and concern and heard at the earliest practicable moment. The courts shall be open at all times for the purposes of this article.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1547, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to provisions of several former sections as they existed prior to 1981. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

32-1-110. Construction with other laws.

If any provisions of this article are inconsistent with the provisions of any other law, the provisions of this article 1 control; except that the water conservation policy set forth in section 37-60-126 (11) applies to all land within a special district that is not used as a playing surface for organized sports activities.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1547, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (HB 19-1050), ch. 25, p. 84, § 2, effective March 7.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 32-4-131 as it existed prior to 1981.

32-1-111. Validation of special districts - bonds.

The organization pursuant to law of any special district, by decree of a court of competent jurisdiction entered prior to July 1, 1981, and the obligations incurred by and the bonds of such districts issued prior to July 1, 1981, and the proceedings related thereto, are hereby validated.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1547, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to provisions of several former sections as they existed prior to 1981. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

32-1-112. Validation of boundaries of metropolitan districts.

All changes or purported changes to the corporate boundaries of existing metropolitan districts, which changes were initiated prior to March 1, 1981, and are completed prior to July 1, 1981, are hereby validated notwithstanding any lack of power or authority, other than constitutional. Such boundary changes shall be the valid boundaries of the respective districts in accordance with their terms and authorization proceedings. This section shall not operate to validate any boundary change which was determined in any legal proceedings to be illegal, void, or ineffective prior to March 1, 1981, or any boundary change the validity of which is the subject of a legal proceeding instituted prior to March 1, 1981.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1547, § 1, effective July 1.

32-1-113. Liberal construction.

This article, being necessary to secure the public health, safety, convenience, and welfare, shall be liberally construed to effect its purposes.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1547, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 32-1-111 and 32-4-130 as they existed prior to 1981.